Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1270.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, No.150), known as the Childhood Blood Lead Test Act, is amended to read:An ActProviding for blood lead assessment and testing of certain children and pregnant women by health care [providers] practitioners; imposing duties on the Department of Health; and requiring certain health insurance policies to cover blood lead tests.Section 2. Section 3(3) of the act is amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 3. Legislative purpose.The purposes of this act are:* * *(3) To encourage the testing of all children in this Commonwealth by [two years] nine months of age so that prompt diagnosis and treatment, as well as the prevention of harm, are possible.Section 3. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Child." An individual younger than 18 years of age. * * *"Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.* * *Section 4. Sections 5 and 6(a) and (b)(2) of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Lead poisoning prevention, assessment and testing.(a) Lead testing for children.--[(1) The following apply:(i) A health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure in an individual patient by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy 20250HB1270PN1423 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of Pediatrics by 24 months of age.(ii) If a patient has never been tested in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age, a health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in an individual patient between 24 months and 72 months of age.(iii) A health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient's parent or legal guardian understands the risks and benefits of blood lead testing prior to obtaining consent.(2) If a patient's parent or legal guardian consents to blood lead testing for the patient under paragraph (1) and the results of a capillary blood lead test indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test after obtaining the consent of the patient's parent or legal guardian.](1) A health care practitioner who assumes the responsibility for the postnatal care of a child shall offer the child's parent or legal guardian blood lead testing for the child or make a referral for blood lead testing before the child is nine months of age. If the child is enrolled in a government program, the health care practitioner shall notify the parent or legal guardian of the lead testing requirements under 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(r) (relating to definitions). The health care practitioner shall evaluate the child's risk factors for lead exposure and notify the parent or legal guardian if the child may be at higher risk for lead 20250HB1270PN1423 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exposure.(2) If a child has not received a blood lead test by nine months of age, a health care practitioner shall consider possible lead exposure in the child by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing on the child or make a referral for blood lead testing in accordance with the recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics before the child is 24 months of age.(3) If a child has not received a blood lead test in accordance with the recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics before the child is 24 months of age, a health care practitioner shall consider possible lead exposure and perform blood lead testing on the child or make a referral for blood lead testing when the child is between 24 months and 72 months of age.(4) If a child's parent or legal guardian consents to blood lead testing under this subsection, a health care practitioner shall perform blood lead testing or make a referral for blood lead testing. Testing under this subsection shall not be performed unless the child's parent or legal guardian provides written consent to the health care practitioner.(5) Prior to obtaining consent from a child's parent or legal guardian for a blood lead test, a health care practitioner shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the parent or legal guardian understands the risks and benefits of the blood lead test.(6) If the results of a capillary blood lead test on a 20250HB1270PN1423 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 child indicate an elevated blood lead level, a health care practitioner shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test, or make a referral for a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test after obtaining the written consent of the child's parent or legal guardian.(b) Lead exposure risk assessment and testing requirements for pregnant women.--A health care [provider] practitioner shall consider possible lead exposure in individual pregnant women by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(c) Reporting.--Health care [providers] practitioners and laboratories shall comply with reporting regulations as specified in 28 Pa. Code § 27.34 (relating to reporting cases of lead poisoning).Section 6. Duties of department.(a) Comprehensive educational program.--The department shall conduct a public information campaign to inform parents of young children, physicians, nurses and other health care [providers] practitioners of the lead assessment and testing requirements of this act.(b) Distribution of literature about childhood lead poisoning.--* * *(2) Educational materials shall be available at no cost and shall be developed for specific audiences, including health care [providers] practitioners, homeowners, landlords 20250HB1270PN1423 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and parents or caregivers.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1270PN1423 - 6 - 12